California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(h) Failure to keep the licensee’s or registrant’s premises and all equipment therein in a clean and sanitary condition.

(i) Fraud, deception, negligence, or incompetence in the practice of veterinary medicine.

(j) Aiding or abetting in any acts that are in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

(k) The employment of fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in obtaining the
 license, registration, or permit.

(l) The revocation, suspension, or other discipline by another state or territory of a license, certificate, or registration to practice veterinary medicine or as a veterinary technician in that state or territory.

(m) Cruelty to animals, conviction on a charge of cruelty to animals, or both.

(n) Disciplinary action taken by any public agency in any state or territory for any act substantially related to the practice of veterinary medicine or the practice of a veterinary technician, or veterinary assistant controlled substance permitholder.

(o) Violation, or the assisting or abetting violation, of any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(p) Accepting, soliciting, or offering any form of remuneration from or to a cannabis licensee if the veterinarian or the veterinarian’s immediate family have a financial interest with the cannabis licensee. For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Cannabis licensee” shall have the same meaning as “licensee” in Section 26001.

(2) “Financial interest” shall have the same meaning as in Section 650.01.

(q) Discussing or recommending cannabis for use with a client while the veterinarian is employed by, or has an agreement with, a cannabis
 licensee. For purposes of this subdivision, “cannabis licensee” shall have the same meaning as “licensee” in Section 26001.

(r) Distributing any form of advertising for cannabis in California.

(s) Making any statement, claim, or advertisement that the licensee or registrant is a veterinary specialist or board certified unless they are certified by an American Veterinary Medical Association-Recognized Veterinary Specialty Organization or a National Association of Veterinary Technicians in America-Recognized Veterinary Specialty Organization.

(t) Exercising control over, interfering with, or attempting to influence the professional judgment of another California-licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician through coercion, extortion, inducement, collusion, or intimidation through any means, including, but
 not limited to, compensation, in order to require the other California-licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician to perform veterinary services in a manner inconsistent with current veterinary medical practice in this state.

(u) Performing a surgical claw removal, declawing, onychectomy, or a tendonectomy on any feline or otherwise altering a feline’s toes, claws, or paws to prevent or impair the normal function of the feline’s toes, claws, or paws for any reason other than a therapeutic purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 479, Sec. 4.5.   (AB 867)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4884.

(a) A licensee shall not dispense or administer cannabis or cannabis products to an animal patient.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law and absent negligence or incompetence, a veterinarian licensed under this chapter shall not be disciplined by the board or have their license denied, revoked, or suspended solely for discussing or recommending the use of cannabis on an animal for potential therapeutic effect or health supplementation purposes.

(c) On or before January 1, 2020, the board shall adopt guidelines for veterinarians to follow when discussing cannabis within the veterinarian-client-patient relationship. The board shall post
 the guidelines on its internet website.

(d) By January 1, 2024, the board shall adopt guidelines for veterinarians to follow when recommending cannabis within the veterinarian-client-patient relationship. The board shall post the guidelines on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 389, Sec. 2.   (AB 1885)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4885.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of a felony or of any offense related to the practice of veterinary medicine is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license, registration, or permit to be suspended or revoked, or assess a fine as provided in Section 4883 or may decline to issue a license, registration, or permit when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4, 1210.1, or 3063.1 of the Penal Code allowing that person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the
 accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 35.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4886.

In reinstating a license, registration, or permit that has been revoked or suspended under Section 4883, the board may impose terms and conditions to be followed by the licensee, registrant, or permitholder after the license, registration, or permit has been reinstated. The authority of the board to impose terms and conditions includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Requiring the licensee, registrant, or permitholder to obtain additional professional training and to pass an examination upon completion of the training.

(b) Requiring the licensee, registrant, or permitholder to pass a verbal, written, practical, or clinical examination, or any combination of those examinations, to determine their present fitness to
 engage in the practice of veterinary medicine.

(c) Requiring the licensee, registrant, or permitholder to submit to a complete diagnostic examination by one or more physicians appointed by the board. If the board requires the licensee, registrant, or permitholder to submit to that examination, the board shall receive and consider any other report of a complete diagnostic examination given by one or more physicians of the licensee’s, registrant’s, or permitholder’s choice.

(d) Restricting or limiting the extent, scope, or type of practice of the licensee, registrant, or permitholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 36.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4887.

(a) (1) A person whose license or registration has been revoked or who has been placed on probation may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty including modification or termination of probation after the period as described below in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, has elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering the disciplinary action. The petition shall state facts as required by the board. The period shall be as follows:

(A) At least three years for reinstatement of a surrendered or revoked license.

(B) At least two years for early termination or modification of probation of three years or more.

(C) At least one year for modification of a condition or termination of probation of less than three years.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board may, upon a showing of good cause, specify in a revocation order, a surrender order, or an order imposing probation of more than three years that the person may petition the board for reinstatement or modification or termination of probation after one year.

(b) The petition shall be accompanied by both of the following:

(1) At least two verified recommendations from veterinarians licensed by the board who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.

(2) A full set of fingerprints for
 purposes of conducting a criminal history record check.

(c) The petition shall be heard by the board. The board may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities since the license or registration was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitation efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the board finds necessary.

(d) The board reinstating the license or registration or modifying a penalty may impose terms and conditions as it determines necessary. To reinstate a revoked license or registration or to otherwise reduce a penalty or modify probation shall require a vote of five of the members of the board.

(e) The petition
 shall not be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. The board may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 37.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Revenue [4900. - 4905.]

4900.

(a) All veterinary licenses, veterinary technician registrations, and veterinary assistant controlled substance permits, shall expire at 12 midnight of the last day of the month in which the license was issued during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed.

(b) All premises registrations shall expire annually at 12 midnight of the last day of the month in which the license was issued, unless renewed.

(c) To renew an unexpired license, registration, or permit, the licensee, registrant, or permitholder shall, on or before the date of expiration of the license or registration, apply for renewal on a
 form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee. The renewal application shall contain a statement to the effect that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor, has not been the subject of professional disciplinary action taken by any public agency in California or any other state or territory, and has not violated any of the provisions of this chapter. If the applicant is unable to make that statement, the application shall contain a statement of the conviction, professional discipline, or violation.

(d) Each licensee, registrant, and permitholder who has an electronic mail address shall report to the board that electronic mail address during the time of renewal and confirm that the electronic mail address and address of record is current and valid. The electronic mail address shall be considered
 confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 41.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an expired license or registration may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration on filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license or registration is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensee or registrant, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license or registration shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in
 Section 4900 that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 80, Sec. 19.   (AB 107)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.1.

A license or registration that is suspended is subject to expiration, and shall be renewed as provided in this chapter, but that renewal does not entitle the licensee or registrant, while the license or registration remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed or registered activity, or in any other activity in violation of the order or judgment by which the license or registration was suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 80, Sec. 20.   (AB 107)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4901.2.

(a) A revoked or surrendered license, registration, or permit is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it shall not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, registrant, or permitholder, as a condition precedent to reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(b) If reinstatement fees, delinquency fees, or reimbursement of costs of prosecution and enforcement, as applicable, are not paid by a petitioner pursuant to Section 4887 within one year of the effective date of a decision reinstating the license, registration, or permit,
 the petition shall be deemed abandoned, and the license, registration, or permit shall not be reinstated as ordered by the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 38.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4902.

A license, registration, or permit that is not renewed within five years after its expiration shall be canceled and shall not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, but the licensee, registrant, or permitholder may apply for and obtain a new license, registration, or permit if the person applies for a license, registration, or permit as a new applicant and meets all of the requirements for the license, registration, or permit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 40.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4903.

Of all fines or forfeitures of bail in any case where a person is charged with a violation of this chapter, 50 percent shall be paid upon collection by the proper officer of the court to the State Treasurer, to be deposited to the credit of the California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund. The other 50 percent shall be paid as provided by law, for the payment of fines or forfeitures of bail in misdemeanor cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 68.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4904.

All fees collected on behalf of the board and all receipts of every kind and nature shall be reported each month for the month preceding to the Controller and at the same time the entire amount shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund. The California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the use of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 69.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4905.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Small veterinary premises” means a veterinary premises where up to three full-time equivalent veterinarians provide veterinary services.

(2) “Medium veterinary premises” means a veterinary premises where four to eight full-time equivalent veterinarians provide veterinary services.

(3) “Large veterinary premises” means a veterinary premises where nine or more full-time equivalent veterinarians provide veterinary services.

(b) The following fees shall be collected by the board and shall be credited to the
 California Veterinary Medical Board Contingent Fund:

(1) The veterinarian license application fee shall not exceed five hundred forty dollars ($540).

(2) The California Veterinary Medicine Practice Act course fee shall not exceed one hundred fifty-five dollars ($155).

(3) The initial veterinarian license fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).

(4) The biennial veterinarian license renewal fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).

(5) The university licensee application fee shall not exceed five hundred forty dollars ($540).

(6) The initial university license fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars
 ($800).

(7) The biennial university licensee renewal fee shall not exceed eight hundred dollars ($800).

(8) The initial small veterinary premises registration fee shall not exceed eight hundred forty dollars ($840) annually.

(9) The annual small veterinary premises registration renewal fee shall not exceed nine hundred ten dollars ($910).

(10) The initial medium veterinary premises registration fee shall not exceed one thousand one hundred twenty dollars ($1,120).

(11) The annual medium veterinary premises registration renewal fee shall not exceed one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).

(12) The initial large
 veterinary premises registration fee shall not exceed one thousand six hundred seventy-five dollars ($1,675).

(13) The annual large veterinary premises registration renewal fee shall not exceed one thousand seven hundred forty-five dollars ($1,745).

(14) The registered veterinary technician application fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(15) The initial registered veterinary technician registration fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(16) The biennial registered veterinary technician renewal fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(17) The veterinary assistant controlled substance permit application fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars
 ($300).

(18) The veterinary assistant controlled substance permit fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(19) The biennial veterinary assistant controlled substance permit renewal fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).

(20) All license, registration, and permit delinquency fees shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of the renewal, but shall not be less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 41.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Veterinary Corporations [4910. - 4917.]

4910.

A veterinary corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are licensed veterinarians are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, and all other statutes and regulations pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs. With respect to a veterinary corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 71.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4911.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the name of a veterinary corporation and any name or names under which it renders professional services shall include the words “veterinary corporation” or wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1578, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4912.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of a veterinary corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1578, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4913.

The income of a veterinary corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of that shareholder or his or her shares in the veterinary corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1578, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4914.

A veterinary corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule, or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes, rules and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under Section 4848.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1578, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4915.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter, punishable as specified in Section 4831, for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400), of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, or any regulation adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1578, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4916.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and the objectives of this article, including rules and regulations requiring (1) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a veterinary corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of the corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of the corporation within such time as such rules and regulations may provide, and (2) that a veterinary corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1578, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4917.

Nothing in this article requires an applicant for or a holder of a certificate of registration of veterinary premises described in Section 4853 to be a veterinary corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1578, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Community Blood Banks for Animals [4920. - 4920.8.]

4920.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Adverse event” means an event in which an animal is injured, sickened, rendered unconscious, or killed.

(b) “Blood and blood component products” has the same meaning as in Section 9201 of the Food and Agricultural Code and means whole blood collected directly from a donor animal for transfusion or the blood components for transfusion, including packed red blood cells, platelet-rich plasma, platelet concentrates, fresh plasma, fresh frozen plasma, frozen plasma, cryoprecipitate, and cryosupernatant. Antibody products like hyperimmune serums are considered “biologics” and are excluded from this definition of blood and blood component
 products.

(c) “Captive closed colony” means that an animal is kept, housed, or maintained in any way for the purpose of collecting its blood.

(d) “Closed-colony blood bank” means a commercial blood bank for animals that produces animal blood or blood component products solely from animals held in a captive closed colony.

(e) “Commercial blood bank for animals” means an establishment that produces animal blood or blood component products from captive closed-colony or community-sourced animals to market and sell for use in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of injury or disease in animals.

(f) “Community blood bank” means a commercial blood bank for animals that produces animal blood or blood component products solely from community-sourced
 animals whose owners voluntarily consent to the donation. 

(g) “Community sourced” means that an animal is all of the following:

(1) Kept, housed, and maintained at the residence of its owner who is a person and not a partnership, association, corporation, or limited liability company.

(2) Brought by its owner to a community blood bank for animals to have its blood collected.

(3) Licensed in accordance with any pet licensing required by the pet owner’s state, county, or city of residence.

(h) “Production” means the collection of blood or the preparation, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of blood or blood component products for purpose of transfusion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.1.

For purposes of liability pursuant to this article, the production and use of whole blood, plasma, blood products, and blood derivatives for purposes of injecting or transfusing the same, or any of them, into an animal shall be construed to be, and is declared to be, the rendition of a service by each and every person, firm, or corporation participating therein, and shall not be construed to be, and is declared not to be, a sale of that whole blood, plasma, blood products, or blood derivatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.2.

Each veterinarian who is licensed in California and engages in the production of animal blood and blood component products solely for use in their own practice or for a community blood bank operating under this article shall meet all of the following conditions:

(a) Follow current and best practices on community animal blood banking, which may include those developed pursuant to Section 9255 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(b) Operate under conditions, and use methods of production, that are consistent with current standards of care and practice for the field of veterinary transfusion medicine to ensure that the animal blood and blood
 component products will not be contaminated, dangerous, or harmful.

(c) Ensure that the production of blood and blood component products is safe and not injurious to the donor animal’s health.

(d) Follow, to the extent possible, the latest blood banking standards, which may include the latest published edition of the American Association of Blood Banks’ standards, and maintain responsibility over all veterinary and technical policies and procedures that relate to the safety of staff members and donor animals.

(e) Utilize bloodborne pathogen testing for all canine and feline blood donors in accordance with the best clinical practices in the veterinary field, which may include the most recent Consensus Statement on
 blood donor infectious disease screening by the American College of Veterinary Internal Medicine.

(f) Ensure that the production of animal blood and blood component products complies with all applicable federal laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 151) of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(g) Maintain onsite records available for inspection by the board, including information documenting any history of blood draws or use of anesthesia on the animal, the number and date of donations collected, the estimated milliliters of blood collected per donation based on weight in grams, any adverse events, and any complaints from owners regarding animals who donate blood or blood component products.

(h) Obtain the informed written consent of the owner of the animal blood donor and keep a record of that consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 72.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.3.

(a) A veterinarian or a community blood bank operating under this article shall not provide payment to a person who provides an animal for the purpose of donating that animal’s blood and blood component products for use in their practice or for retail sale and distribution. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “payment” means the transfer to any person of money or other valuable consideration that can be converted to money by the recipient. For purposes of this section, “payment” does not include fees for veterinary tests, medications, vaccinations, screenings, or other services that benefit the health of the animal from which the blood or blood component products were taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.4.

The board may establish a community blood bank registration fee and annual renewal fee to be paid by community blood banks to cover costs associated with oversight and inspection of the premises. The fee shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs of administering, implementing, and enforcing this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 73.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.5.

A community blood bank operating under this article shall comply with blood or blood component product registration requirements under Article 5 (commencing with Section 9241) of Chapter 1.5 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.6.

A community blood bank operating under this article shall submit a quarterly report to the Department of Food and Agriculture every three months that includes all of the following information:

(a) The number of donations from community-sourced animals and separate total amounts of whole blood, packed red blood cells, and fresh frozen plasma sold in California during that quarter, by species of animal in estimated milliliters based on weight in grams.

(b) The number and species of animal donors experiencing adverse events, the total number of adverse events, and the nature of adverse events experienced by animals that donate blood.

(c) The number and species of animal donors that have donated blood.

(d) The number and species of animal donors whose blood tested positive for known pathogens, in accordance with the best clinical practices in the veterinary field, which may include the most recent Consensus Statement for blood donor infectious disease screening by the American College of Veterinary Internal Medicine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.7.

Each veterinarian who is licensed in California and operates a closed-colony blood bank shall comply with Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 9201) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 4.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.8.

A violation of this article by a community blood bank shall constitute a cause for corrective action, suspension, restriction, or the nonrenewal or revocation of a license or registration by the board pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4875).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 74.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Acupuncture [4925. - 4979.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration and General Provisions [4925. - 4934.2.]

4925.

(a) This chapter constitutes the chapter on acupuncture of the Business and Professions Code.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Acupuncture Licensure Act. Whenever a reference is made to the Acupuncture Licensure Act by the provisions of any statute, it is to be construed as referring to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Any reference in this chapter, or to the regulations pertaining thereto, to “certificate” or “certification” shall hereafter mean “license” or “licensure.” Any reference to the term “certifying” means “licensing,” and the term “certificate holder” means “licensee.” Any reference to the “Acupuncture Committee” or “committee” means the “Acupuncture Board” or “board.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 991, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4926.

In its concern with the need to eliminate the fundamental causes of illness, not simply to remove symptoms, and with the need to treat the whole person, the Legislature intends to establish in this article, a framework for the practice of the art and science of Asian medicine through acupuncture.

The purpose of this article is to encourage the more effective utilization of the skills of acupuncturists by California citizens desiring a holistic approach to health and to remove the existing legal constraints which are an unnecessary hindrance to the more effective provision of health care services. Also, as it effects the public health, safety, and welfare, there is a necessity that individuals practicing acupuncture be subject to regulation and control as a primary health care profession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 649, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4927.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Board” means the Acupuncture Board.

(b) “Person” means any individual, organization, or corporate body, except that only individuals may be licensed under this chapter.

(c) “Acupuncturist” means an individual to whom a license has been issued to practice acupuncture pursuant to this chapter, which is in effect and is not suspended or revoked.

(d) “Acupuncture” means the stimulation of a certain point or points on or near the surface of the body by
 the insertion of needles to prevent or modify the perception of pain or to normalize physiological functions, including pain control for the treatment of certain diseases or dysfunctions of the body, and includes the techniques of electroacupuncture, cupping, and moxibustion.

(e) “Supervising acupuncturist” means a person who meets the following conditions:

(1) Is licensed to practice acupuncture in this state and that license is current, valid, and has not been suspended or revoked or otherwise subject to formal disciplinary action, unless approved by the board.

(2) Has practiced as a licensed acupuncturist in this state for at least five years.

(3) Is in compliance with subdivision (j) of Section 4955.

(f) (1) “Acupuncture assistant” means a person who, without a license, may perform basic supportive acupuncture procedures under the supervision and order of an acupuncturist.

(2) The supervising acupuncturist shall be physically present and available in the place of practice during the performance of any ordered basic supportive acupuncture procedures.

(3) The supervising acupuncturist engaging the services of an acupuncture assistant shall be responsible for the training and overall competency of the acupuncture assistant, including the ability to perform any specific basic supportive
 acupuncture service.

(4) The supervising acupuncturist shall ensure the acupuncture assistant meets the following:

(A) Is enrolled in an approved educational and training program and has completed at least a minimum of 700 hours of clinical practice or has completed an approved educational and training program.

(B) Holds a certificate in Clean Needle Technique issued by the Council of Colleges of Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity, or has completed an approved educational and training program’s Clean Needle Technique course using the Council of Colleges of Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine Clean Needle Technique, 7th edition, revised 1/2016.

(g) (1) “Basic supportive acupuncture service” means any of the following:

(A) Needle removal.

(B) Cupping.

(C) Moxibustion.

(D) Gua sha.

(E) Any other service listed under subdivision (b) of Section 4937.

(2) “Basic supportive acupuncture service” does not include diagnosis, point location, needle insertion, electrical stimulation, rendering advice to patients, or any other procedure requiring a similar degree of judgment or skill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 6.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4927.5.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “approved educational and training program” means a school or college offering education and training in the practice of an acupuncturist that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Offers curriculum that includes at least 3,000 hours of which at least 2,050 hours are didactic and laboratory training, and at least 950 hours are supervised clinical instruction. Has submitted that curriculum to the board, and has received board approval of the curriculum. Any school or college offering education and training in the practice of acupuncture that was approved by the board prior to January 1, 2017, has not had its approval revoked, and has not changed
 its curriculum since receiving board approval, is deemed to have had its curriculum approved by the board for the purposes of this section.

(2) Has received full institutional approval under Article 6 (commencing with Section 94885) of Chapter 8 of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code in the field of traditional Asian medicine, or in the case of institutions located outside of this state, approval by the appropriate governmental educational authority using standards equivalent to those of Article 6 (commencing with Section 94885) of Chapter 8 of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code.

(3) Meets any of the following:

(A) Is accredited by the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture
 and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity.

(B) Has been granted preaccreditation status by the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity.

(C) Has submitted a letter of intent to pursue accreditation to the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity within 30 days of receiving full institutional approval pursuant to paragraph (2), and is granted preaccreditation status within three years of the date that letter was submitted.

(b) Within 30 days after receiving curriculum pursuant to paragraph (1), the board shall review the curriculum, determine whether the curriculum satisfies the requirements established by the
 board, and notify the school or college, the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Herbal Medicine, or its successor entity, and the Bureau for Private and Postsecondary Education of whether the board has approved the curriculum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 2.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4928.

(a) The Acupuncture Board, which consists of seven members, shall enforce and administer this chapter.

(b) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 682, Sec. 3.   (AB 1264)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)